Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [3.058] EDUCATION COMMITTEE MEMBERS. new text end new text begin (a) A member of the legislature serving on a legislative committee with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education policy or finance must spend at least 12 hours over the biennium observing a teacher or administrator in an elementary, middle, or secondary school. new text end new text begin (b) A member of the house of representatives must report to the speaker of the house, and a member of the senate must report to the senate majority leader, the following information for each observation: (1) date and hours of observation; (2) name of each teacher or administrator observed; (3) school site observed; and (4) grade levels observed. new text end new text begin The member must make the report available electronically to the Legislative Reference Library. The Legislative Reference Library must publish each member report on its website. new text end new text begin (c) The house of representatives and the senate must adopt rules to implement this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end